South Dakota, session 2026, HB1233.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 10-12A-4 be AMENDED:
10-12A-4. The department may enter into tax collection agreements with any
Indian tribe under the provisions of this chapter and chapter 1-24. These agreements may
provide for the collection of any of the following state taxes and any tribal taxes imposed
by a tribe that are identical to the following state taxes:
(1) The retail sales and service tax imposed by chapter 10-45, including the application
thereof under chapters 10-64 and 10-65;
(2) The use tax imposed by chapter 10-46, including the application thereof under
chapters 10-64 and 10-65;
(3) The contractors' excise tax imposed by chapter 10-46A;
(4) The alternate contractors' excise tax imposed by chapter 10-46B;
(5) The cigarette tax imposed by chapter 10-50;
(6) The motor vehicle excise tax imposed by chapter 32-5B;
(7) The fuel excise tax imposed by chapter 10-47B;
(8) The wholesale tax on tobacco products imposed by chapter 10-50;
(9) The amusement device tax imposed by chapter 10-58;
(10) The gross receipts tax on visitor related businesses imposed by chapter 10-45D;
and
(11) The excise tax on farm machinery, attachment units, and irrigation equipment
imposed by chapter 10-46E.
The agreement may provide for the retention by the department of an agreed-
upon percentage of the gross revenue as an administrative fee.

26.906.15 2 1233
An Act to modify provisions for a tax collection agreement with an Indian tribe.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1233
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1233 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1233 ENROLLED